Maine, session 132, LD549.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 24 MRSA §2986, sub-§3, as amended by PL 2019, c. 94, §1, is further
amended to read:
3. Completed kit. If the alleged victim has not reported the alleged offense to a law
enforcement agency when the examination is complete, the hospital or health care
practitioner shall then notify the nearest law enforcement agency, which shall transport and
store the completed forensic examination kit for 8 20 years. The completed kit may be
identified only by the tracking number. If during that storage period an alleged victim
decides to report the alleged offense to a law enforcement agency, the alleged victim may
contact the hospital or health care practitioner to determine the tracking number. The
hospital or health care practitioner shall provide the alleged victim with the tracking
number on the forensic examination kit and shall inform the alleged victim which law
enforcement agency is storing the kit.
An alleged victim who has not reported the alleged offense to a law enforcement agency
may request that a completed forensic examination kit be transported to the Maine State
Police Crime Laboratory and be processed by signing a consent form indicating that the
alleged victim wants the kit to be tested, and the results of the analysis must be kept
anonymous.
If the alleged victim reports the alleged offense to a law enforcement agency by the time
the examination is complete, the investigating agency shall retain custody of the forensic
examination kit.
If an examination is performed under subsection 5 and the alleged victim does not, within
60 days, regain a state of consciousness adequate to decide whether or not to report the
alleged offense, the State may file a motion in the District Court relating to storing or
processing the forensic examination kit. Upon finding good cause and after considering
factors, including, but not limited to, the possible benefits to public safety in processing the
kit and the likelihood of the alleged victim's regaining a state of consciousness adequate to
decide whether or not to report the alleged offense in a reasonable time, the District Court
may order either that the kit be stored for additional time or that the kit be transported to
Page 1 - 132LR0053(01)

414 the Maine State Police Crime Laboratory for processing, or such other disposition that the
425 court determines just. In the interests of justice or upon motion by the State, the District
436 Court may conduct hearings required under this paragraph confidentially and in camera
447 and may impound pleadings and other records related to them.
A law enforcement agency shall store a completed forensic examination kit involving
alleged sexual assault for 20 years regardless of whether the alleged offense is reported to
a law enforcement agency.
Beginning January 1, 2027, completed forensic examination kits must be transported to the
Maine State Police Crime Laboratory and be processed.
Beginning January 1, 2027, and every 5 years thereafter, a law enforcement agency shall
transport to the Maine State Police Crime Laboratory completed forensic examination kits
that are being stored by that law enforcement agency and that identify an alleged victim.
Beginning with the kits most recently stored by the law enforcement agency, the Maine
State Police Crime Laboratory shall process those kits on a rolling basis. The Department
of Public Safety shall adopt rules to implement testing requirements under this subsection.
Rules adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5,
chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.
Sec. 2. 25 MRSA §2915-A is enacted to read:
§2915-A. Sexual assault forensic examination kit tracking system
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Crime laboratory" means the Maine State Police Crime Laboratory located in
Augusta or another laboratory that provides forensic services to law enforcement
agencies for the purpose of analyzing forensic examination kits.
B. "Department" means the Department of Public Safety.
C. "Forensic examination kit" or "kit" means a uniform standardized forensic
examination kit developed by the department pursuant to section 2915, subsection 1
for evidence collection by a licensed health care provider in alleged cases of sexual
assault.
D. "Law enforcement agency" means the State Police, a county law enforcement
agency or a municipal law enforcement agency.
E. "Licensed health care provider" means:
(1) A hospital licensed under Title 22, chapter 405; or
(2) A health care practitioner who is licensed by this State to provide or otherwise
lawfully providing health care or a partnership or corporation made up of such
health care practitioners.
F. "Sexual assault" means a crime enumerated in Title 17-A, chapter 11.
G. "Tracking system" means the forensic examination kit tracking system established
by the department pursuant to subsection 2.
2. Forensic examination kit tracking system. The department shall establish,
operate and maintain a tracking system for all completed forensic examination kits,
Page 2 - 132LR0053(01)

412 regardless of whether the alleged offense relating to the kit was reported to a law
423 enforcement agency, that is continuously accessible to approved users.
A. The department shall establish, operate and maintain the tracking system through
the use of department personnel and resources and may contract with public or private
entities, including, but not limited to, software and technology providers, to accomplish
the department's duties related to the tracking system.
B. Approved users shall adhere to the following procedures when entering information
for each kit into the tracking system, which must, at a minimum, collect the following
information.
(1) A crime laboratory shall enter into the tracking system each new and unused
kit and record each kit's intended destination before the kit leaves the possession
of the crime laboratory.
(2) A licensed health care provider shall enter into the tracking system the date it
receives each kit from a crime laboratory.
(3) A licensed health care provider shall identify when a kit was used for evidence
collection and enter into the tracking system the date when the kit was used.
(4) A licensed health care provider shall identify when a completed kit is
transferred to a law enforcement agency and to which law enforcement agency it
is transferred and enter into the tracking system the date when the kit was
transferred.
(5) A licensed health care provider shall identify when a kit is discarded based on
damage to the kit or its use in training and enter into the tracking system the date
on which the kit was discarded.
(6) A law enforcement agency shall enter into the tracking system the date it
receives a completed kit and the location where the completed kit is being stored.
(7) A law enforcement agency in possession of a completed kit shall enter into the
tracking system the date that law enforcement agency reports to a prosecuting
attorney that a forensic examination has been performed pursuant to Title 24,
section 2986.
(8) A crime laboratory shall identify when it has conducted an analysis of a
completed kit and enter into the tracking system the date of the analysis.
(9) A law enforcement agency that receives a kit after analysis from a crime
laboratory shall identify when it received the kit and whether that kit was stored or
destroyed.
C. The tracking system must provide for the updating and tracking of a forensic
examination kit as follows.
(1) An alleged victim of sexual assault from whom forensic evidence has been
collected using a kit must have access to the tracking system on an anonymous and
secure basis for the purposes of receiving updates regarding the kit and tracking
the status of the kit.
(2) A licensed health care provider, law enforcement agency, prosecuting attorney
or any other entity in possession of a kit must have access to the tracking system
Page 3 - 132LR0053(01)

413 for the purposes of entering, updating and tracking the status and location of the
424 kit.
3. Participation required. Law enforcement agencies, licensed health care providers,
crime laboratories and district attorneys in the State shall participate in the tracking system
on the schedule and in the manner required by department rules adopted pursuant to
subsection 6.
4. Immunity. A person or entity required by subsection 3 to participate in the tracking
system is immune from civil liability for actions taken as a participant that are required by
subsection 3 or by rules adopted pursuant to subsection 6.
5. Report. The department shall report to the joint standing committee of the
Legislature having jurisdiction over criminal justice and public safety matters and the
Governor by January 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, regarding the tracking system. The
report may include recommendations from the department for improved operation of the
tracking system and must include the following information, identified by the county from
which a forensic examination kit was entered into the tracking system:
A. The number of reported kits and the number of anonymous kits in the tracking
system and, of those kits, the number of kits on which analysis has been completed and
the number of kits on which analysis has not been completed;
B. The number of reported kits and the number of anonymous kits entered into the
tracking system during the prior calendar year and, of those kits, the number on which
analysis has been completed and the number on which analysis has not been completed;
C. The average and median lengths of time for forensic examination kits to be sent for
analysis after being entered into the tracking system and for analysis to be completed;
and
D. The number of reported forensic examination kits entered into the tracking system
for more than one year for which analysis has not been completed.
The State Police and any other law enforcement agency that performs its duties in more
than one county shall provide to the department tracking information for each county where
a forensic examination kit was entered into the tracking system.
6. Rules. The commissioner shall adopt rules to govern participation in and
implementation of the tracking system. The rules must include provisions for maintaining
confidentiality of tracking system information; provisions to ensure timely posting to the
tracking system; a process for approving tracking system users and access for approved
users; procedures for posting information and for updating information in the tracking
system; and requirements for documentation of persons who have posted, accessed and
updated information in the tracking system. Rules adopted pursuant to this subsection are
routine technical rules as defined by Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.
Sec. 3. 25 MRSA §3821, as amended by PL 2023, c. 236, §1, is further amended to
read:
§3821. Transportation and storage of forensic examination kits
For the purposes of this section, "sexual assault" means any crime enumerated in Title
17‑A, chapter 11 and "strangulation" has the same meaning as in Title 17‑A, section 208,
subsection 1, paragraph C.
Page 4 - 132LR0053(01)

If an alleged victim of sexual assault or strangulation has a forensic examination and
has not reported the alleged offense to a law enforcement agency when the examination is
complete, the licensed hospital or licensed health care practitioner that completed the
forensic examination shall notify the nearest law enforcement agency. That law
enforcement agency shall transport the completed forensic examination kit, identified only
by a tracking number assigned by the kit manufacturer, to its evidence storage facility. The
law enforcement agency shall store the forensic examination kits involving sexual assault
for 20 years and forensic examination kits involving only strangulation for 6 years. If
during that storage period the alleged victim reports the offense to a law enforcement
agency, the investigating agency shall take possession of the forensic examination kit. An
alleged victim who has not reported the alleged offense to a law enforcement agency may
request that a completed forensic examination kit be transported to the Maine State Police
Crime Laboratory and be processed by signing a consent form indicating that the alleged
victim wants the kit to be tested, and the results of the analysis must be kept anonymous.
If an alleged victim of sexual assault or strangulation has a forensic examination and
has reported the alleged offense to a law enforcement agency when the examination is
complete, or the alleged victim reports the alleged offense after the forensic examination
kit has been transported to the nearest law enforcement agency, the law enforcement agency
investigating the offense shall take possession of that kit.
A law enforcement agency shall store the forensic examination kits involving sexual
assault for 20 years and forensic examination kits involving only strangulation for 6 years,
regardless of whether the alleged offense relating to the kit is reported to a law enforcement
agency. Beginning January 1, 2027, completed forensic examination kits must be
transported to the Maine State Police Crime Laboratory and be processed.
In the case of a forensic examination performed under Title 24, section 2986,
subsection 5, the law enforcement agency must immediately notify the district attorney for
the district in which the hospital or health care practitioner is located that such a forensic
examination has been performed and a forensic examination kit has been completed under
Title 24, section 2986, subsection 5.
Sec. 4. 25 MRSA §3822 is enacted to read:
§3822. Identifiable completed forensic examination kits; mandatory processing
Beginning January 1, 2027, and every 5 years thereafter, a law enforcement agency
shall transport to the Maine State Police Crime Laboratory completed forensic examination
kits that are being stored by that law enforcement agency and that identify an alleged
victim. Beginning with the kits most recently stored by the law enforcement agency, the
Maine State Police Crime Laboratory shall process those kits on a rolling basis. The
Department of Public Safety shall adopt rules to implement testing requirements under this
section. Rules adopted pursuant to this section are routine technical rules as defined in Title
5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.
Sec. 5. Sexual assault forensic examination kit inventory. By June 1, 2026,
all law enforcement agencies that receive, maintain, store or preserve forensic examination
kits shall complete an inventory of all kits in their possession and shall report their findings
to the Department of Public Safety. At a minimum, reported findings to the department
must include a breakdown by year by each agency of the number of:
Page 5 - 132LR0053(01)

1. Reported and anonymous kits received;
2. Reported kits that were never analyzed; and
3. Reported kits returned after analysis.
The department shall compile all agency findings and present a report of the inventory
by January 1, 2027 to the joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction
over criminal justice and public safety matters. At the same time, the department shall post
the report on its publicly accessible website.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.